District of Columbia statutes.
31-3311.11

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Affordable Care Act” means the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act approved March 23, 2010 (124 Stat. 111; 42 U.S.C. § 18001, note).

(2)

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking established by Chapter 1 of this title [§ 31-101 et seq.].

April 8, 2011. D.C. Law 18-360, § 112
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-265, § 104(c), 62 DCR 1529